Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.420

Application for change of or additional sales days, special sales—Considerations for allocation.

(1) Any application for a change of sales day or days or additional sales day or days for an existing salesyard shall be subject to approval by the director, subsequent to a hearing and the director is hereby authorized to approve these days and class of livestock which may be sold on these days. In considering the approval or denial of these sales days, the director shall give appropriate consideration, among other relevant factors, to the following:

(a) The geographical area which will be affected;

(b) The conflict, if any, with sales days already allocated in the area;

(c) The amount and class of livestock available for marketing in the area;

(d) Buyers available to such market;

(e) Any other conditions affecting the orderly marketing of livestock.

(2) No special sales shall be conducted by the licensee unless the licensee has applied to the director in writing fifteen days prior to such proposed sale. Each application must be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars.

(3) In any case that a licensee fails to conduct sales on the sales days allocated to the licensee, the director shall, subsequent to a hearing, be authorized to revoke an allocation for nonuse. The rate of usage required to maintain an allocation shall be established by rule.

[ 2003 c 326 s 87; 1991 c 17 s 3; 1963 c 232 s 16; 1961 c 182 s 6. Prior: 1959 c 107 s 42.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.